Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-506
Insurance coverage; authorized.

The school board or board of education of any school district may permit its members to participate in the school district's hospitalization, medical, surgical, accident, sickness, or term life insurance coverage or any one or more of such coverages. A board member electing to participate in the insurance program of the school district shall pay both the employee and the employer portions of the premium for such coverage.

A school board or board of education which opts to permit its members to participate in insurance coverage under this section shall report quarterly at a board meeting the board members who have elected such coverage. Such a report shall be made available in the school district office for review by the public upon request.

Laws 2008, LB850, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 32.
January 1, 2019